Hawaii statutes.
§481B-6 Sale of solar energy devices;
disclosure requirements. (a) No person shall advertise, offer to sell, or
sell a solar energy device unless the person clearly discloses separately the
following information concerning the sale price of the solar energy device to
the consumer:

(1) The cost of the solar energy device and
accessories related to the operation of the solar energy device and for their
installation; and

(2) The cost of items unrelated to the operation of
the solar energy device, including but not limited to, "free gifts",
offers to pay electric bills, rebates, and other incentives designed to promote
the sale of the solar device.

(b) As used in this section, "solar
energy device" means any new identifiable facility, equipment, apparatus,
or the like which makes use of solar energy for heating, cooling, or reducing
the use of other types of energy dependent upon fossil fuel for its generation.
[L 1980, c 177, §1; am L 1996, c 59, §5; am L 2008, c 19, §15]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next